Massachusetts, session 194th, H1949.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 272 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 77C, as
appearing in the 2018 Official Edition, the following section:-
Section 77D. (a) For the purposes of this section, the following words shall, unless the
context clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:-
“Cat”, a living or nonliving specimen of the species Felis catus.
“Consumption”, the eating or cooking of meat, organs, and other components by humans
or animals from animals slaughtered or recovered.
“Dog”, a living or nonliving specimen of the subspecies Canis lupus familiaris.
“Slaughter”, the killing of an animal for consumption of its meat or byproducts.
of 2

(b) No person shall possess, import, sell, buy, give away, traffic or accept any dog or cat
for the purpose of slaughter or consumption.
(c) Any person who violates this section shall be punished by imprisonment in the state
prison for not more than 7 years or imprisonment in the house of correction for not more than 2
½ years or by a fine of not more than $5,000; provided, however, that a second or subsequent
offense shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for not more than 10 years or by a
fine of not more than $10,000 or by both such fine and imprisonment.
(d) This section shall not apply to lawful and accepted practices, including but not limited
to euthanasia pursuant to section 174A of chapter 140, that relate to veterinary medicine
performed by a licensed veterinarian or a certified veterinary technician under the guidance of a
licensed veterinarian pursuant to sections 54 to 59A, inclusive, of chapter 112, nor the practice of
scientific investigation, experiment or instruction licensed pursuant to section 174D of chapter
140.
of 2